Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.020

Objects of survey.

The geological survey shall have for its objects:

(1) An examination of the economic products of the state, including: Gold, silver, copper, lead, and iron ores, as well as building stones, clays, coal, and all mineral substances of value;

(2) An examination and classification of soils, and the study of their adaptability to particular crops;

(3) An investigation and report upon the water supplies, artesian wells, the water power of the state, gauging the streams, etc., with reference to their application for irrigation and other purposes;

(4) An examination and report upon the occurrence of different road building material;

(5) An examination of the physical features of the state with reference to their practical bearing upon the occupations of the people;

(6) The preparation of special geological and economic maps to illustrate the resources of the state;

(7) The preparation of special reports with necessary illustrations and maps, which shall embrace both the general and detailed description of the geology and natural resources of the state; and

(8) The consideration of similar scientific and economic questions that, in the judgment of the state geologist, is deemed of value to the people of the state.

[ 2006 c 340 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.020. Prior: 1901 c 165 s 2; 1890 p 249 s 3; 1890 p 648 ss 3, 4, 5, 6, 7; RRS s 5994.]